District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.185

Prohibited names.

The Mayor may refuse to issue, renew, or transfer a license in a name that:

(1)

Is misleading or would constitute false advertising;

(2)

Implies a partnership, association, or corporation when a partnership, association, or corporation does not exist;

(3)

Includes the name of a salesperson;

(4)

Is in violation of law;

(5)

Is a name which has been used by any person whose license has been suspended;

(6)

Includes the name of a person not otherwise licensed; or

(7)

Is a name which is deceptively similar to a name used by any other licensee.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.185.

Prior Codifications